test/src/morphology/V-atoskah_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - atoskah - help : # Ordinary TA verb - full paradigm
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3SgO: niatoskahâw
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3SgO: kiatoskahâw
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+3SgO: [atoskahêw, atoskahik, atoskahkow]
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3oSg+3SgO: [atoskahêyiwa, atoskahikoyiwa]

     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3SgO: niatoskahânân
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3SgO: kiatoskahânaw
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3SgO: kiatoskahâwâw
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+3SgO: [atoskahêwak, atoskahkow]
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3oPl+3SgO: atoskahêyiwa

     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Sg+3PlO: niatoskahâwak
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Sg+3PlO: kiatoskahâwak
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+3PlO: [atoskahêw, atoskahikowak, atoskahikak]
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3oSg+3PlO: atoskahêyiwa
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3oSg+3oPlO: atoskahikoyiwa

     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+1Pl+3PlO: niatoskahânânak
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+12Pl+3PlO: kiatoskahânawak
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+2Pl+3PlO: kiatoskahâwâwak
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+3PlO: atoskahikowak
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+3PlO: atoskahêwak
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3oPl+3PlO: atoskahêyiwa

     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1SgO: niatoskahik
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2SgO: kiatoskahik
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+1PlO: niatoskahikonân
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+12PlO: kiatoskahikonaw
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Sg+2PlO: kiatoskahikowâw
     
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1SgO: niatoskahikwak
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2SgO: kiatoskahikwak
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+1PlO: niatoskahikonânak
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+12PlO: kiatoskahikonawak
     atoskah+V+TA+Ind+Prs+3Pl+2PlO: kiatoskahikowâwak




     
     
     
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+1Sg+3SgO: ê-atoskahak
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+1Sg+3PlO: ê-atoskahakik
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+1Pl+3SgO: ê-atoskahâyâhk
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+1Pl+3PlO: ê-atoskahâyâhkik
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+12Pl+3SgO: ê-atoskahâyâhk
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+12Pl+3PlO: ê-atoskahâyâhkok
     
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+2Sg+3SgO: ê-atoskahat
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+2Sg+3PlO: ê-atoskahacik
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+2Pl+3SgO: ê-atoskahâyêk
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+2Pl+3PlO: ê-atoskahâyêkok

     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+3Pl+3oPlO: ê-atoskahikocik
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+3Pl+3SgO: ê-atoskahâcik
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+3Pl+3PlO: ê-atoskahâcik
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+3Pl+2SgO: ê-atoskahiskik
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+3Pl+2PlO: ê-atoskahikoyêkok
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+3Pl+1SgO: ê-atoskahicik
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+3Pl+1PlO: ê-atoskahikoyâhkik
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+3Pl+12PlO: ê-atoskahikoyâhkok

     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+3Sg+3oPlO: ê-atoskahikocik
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+3Sg+3SgO: ê-atoskahât
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+3Sg+3PlO: ê-atoskahât
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+3Sg+2SgO: ê-atoskahisk
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+3Sg+2PlO: ê-atoskahikoyêk
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+3Sg+1SgO: ê-atoskahit
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+3Sg+1PlO: ê-atoskahikoyâhk
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+3Sg+12PlO: ê-atoskahikoyahk

     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+3oPl+3oSgO: ê-atoskahkoyit
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+3oPl+3oPlO: ê-atoskahikoyit
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+3oPl+3SgO: ê-atoskahkot
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+3oPl+3SgO: ê-atoskahikot
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+3oPl+3PlO: ê-atoskahikocik

     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+3oSg+3oSgO: ê-atoskahkoyit
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+3oSg+3oPlO: ê-atoskahikoyit
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+3oSg+3SgO: ê-atoskahkot
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+3oSg+3SgO: ê-atoskahikot
     atoskah+V+TA+Sbj+3oSg+3PlO: ê-atoskahikocik


     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+1Sg+3SgO: atoskahaki
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+1Sg+3PlO: atoskahakwâwi
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+1Pl+3SgO: atoskahâyâhki
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+1Pl+3PlO: atoskahâyâhkwâwi
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+12Pl+3SgO: atoskahâyâhko
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+12Pl+3PlO: atoskahâyâhkwâwi

     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+2Sg+3SgO: atoskahaci
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+2Sg+3PlO: atoskahatwâwi
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+2Pl+3SgO: atoskahâyêko
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+2Pl+3PlO: atoskahâyêkwâwi

     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+3Sg+3SgO: atoskahâci
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+3Sg+3oSgO: atoskahâyici
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+3Sg+3PlO: atoskahikotwâwi
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+3Sg+1SgO: atoskahici
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+3Sg+2SgO: atoskahiski
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+3Sg+1PlO: atoskahikoyâhki
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+3Sg+2PlO: atoskahikoyêko
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+3Sg+12PlO: atoskahikoyahko

     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+3Pl+3SgO: atoskahâtwâwi
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+3Pl+3PlO: atoskahâtwâwi
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+3Pl+3PlO: atoskahikotwâwi


     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+3oSg+3SgO: atoskahikoci
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+3oSg+3PlO: atoskahâyici
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+3oPl+3SgO: atoskahikoci
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+3oPl+3PlO: atoskahâyici
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+3oSg+3oPlO: atoskahikoyici
     atoskah+V+TA+Fut+3oPl+3oPlO: atoskahikoyici
